Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.480

Property tax levies or bond retirement levies—Election.

If the petition or resolution initiating the formation of the proposed park and recreation service area proposes that the initial capital or operational costs are to be financed by regular property tax levies for a six-year period as authorized by RCW 36.68.525, or an annual excess levy, or that proposed capital costs are to be financed by the issuance of general obligation bonds and bond retirement levies, a proposition or propositions for such purpose or purposes shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed service area at the same election. A proposition or propositions for regular property tax levies for a six-year period as authorized by RCW 36.68.525, an annual excess levy, or the issuance of general obligation bonds and bond retirement levies, may also be submitted to the voters at any general or special election.

[ 1984 c 131 s 7; 1981 c 210 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 38; 1963 c 218 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 131 ss 3-9: See note following RCW 29A.36.210.

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.